Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2686.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 HF 2686 (2) 91 jda/jh/md H.F. 2686 Section 1. Section 256.165, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. (1) The board shall issue a transitional coaching 3 authorization to an individual applicant who is at least 4 twenty-one years of age and who provides verification of an 5 offer of a coaching position by a school or a consortium of 6 schools, but who has not completed the coursework required 7 for a coaching authorization as specified in paragraph âaâ . 8 A transitional coaching authorization is valid for not more 9 than one year, shall not be renewed, and is valid only in 10 the school or consortium of schools making the offer of the 11 coaching position. A consortium of schools may include a 12 school district, a school district school attendance center, 13 or an accredited nonpublic school, or any combination thereof. 14 However, prior to issuing a transitional coaching authorization 15 to an individual under this paragraph âbâ , the board shall 16 ensure that the individual meets satisfies all of the following 17 requirements: 18 (1) Completes a shortened course of training relating to the 19 code of professional rights and responsibilities, practices, 20 and ethics developed in accordance with section 256.146, 21 subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ , by the board specifically for 22 transitional coaches. 23 (2) (a) Completes The applicant successfully completes the 24 child and dependent adult abuse mandatory reporter training 25 required by sections section 232.69 and 235B.16 . 26 (3) (b) Completes The applicant successfully completes 27 a nationally recognized concussion in youth sports training 28 course. 29 (4) (c) Complies The applicant complies with the background 30 investigation requirements established by the board pursuant to 31 section 256.146, subsection 16 . 32 (d) The applicant successfully completes training related 33 to cardiopulmonary resuscitation. 34 (e) The applicant successfully completes training related 35 -1- HF 2686 (2) 91 jda/jh/md 1/ 2 H.F. 2686 to how use an automated external defibrillator. 1 (2) (a) A transitional coaching authorization shall expire 2 one year after the date of issuance. 3 (b) A transitional coaching authorization shall not be 4 renewed. 5 (3) The board shall allow an individual who holds a 6 transitional coaching authorization to convert the transitional 7 coaching authorization to a coaching authorization if the 8 individual does any of the following: 9 (a) Successfully completes the requirements established in 10 paragraph âaâ . 11 (b) Successfully completes the fundamentals of coaching 12 course created by the national federation of state high school 13 associations. 14 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies transitional 15 coaching authorizations issued by the board of educational 16 examiners pursuant to section 256.165 on or after July 1, 2026. 17 -2- HF 2686 (2) 91 jda/jh/md 2/ 2